src/ParadigmFeatures/Alternations/GetAlternations.foma
load stack ../../ParadigmFeatures/PreciseDeclType/GetPreciseDeclType.bin
invert net
define GetPreciseDeclType;
read lexc ../../ParadigmFeatures/Alternations/GetAlternations.lexc
define AlternationsLexicon;
source ../../LetterClasses.foma
source ../../ParadigmFeatures.foma
define Features DeclType (Gender) (Number) (NumberHom) (ParadigmDefects) GrammRazr (Animacy) (Gender);
define AlternationsExceptions Letter+ 0:Alternation* Features .o. AlternationsLexicon (Features);
regex [..] -> %+Alt6 || [а|я] Irr н и Irr н _ $%+Masc & $%+Anim;
regex [..] -> %+Alt14 || [ё|Ш о Irr] {нок} _ $%+Masc & $%+Anim;
regex [..] -> %+Alt24 || [С|ь] н я _ DeclType;
define Context [Letter+ [ё|а|я|е] {нный}]
 - [Letter* [П| [Letter - ж] д|т|з|с] {ённый}]
 - [Letter* [б|п|ф|т|з|с] {енный}]
 - [Letter* Г Irr [в|м|д] {енный}];
regex [..] -> %+Alt33 || .#. Context _ Features;
regex [..] -> %+Alt34 || [С|ь]{ний} _ Alternation* Feature* %+Extadj;
turn stack
compose net
define AlternationsRules;
define GetAlternations GetPreciseDeclType .o. AlternationsExceptions .P. AlternationsRules;
